Massachusetts, session 194th, S379.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 89 in Chapter 71 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by striking out, starting in line 199, the words “overall student performance
on the statewide assessment system approved by the board under section 1I of chapter 69” and
inserting in place thereof the following words:- “student growth”; and by striking out, starting in
line 214, the words “based on student performance data collected pursuant to section 1I,” and
inserting in place thereof the following word:- “that”; and by striking out, in line 216, the words
“statewide student performance” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- “student
growth”.
of 1